District of Columbia statutes.
36-151

Definitions.

The following words shall, in addition to their ordinary meaning, have the meaning herein given:

(1)

The word “person” or “persons,” in §§ 36-152 to 36-155 and 36-157 shall include firms or corporations.

(2)

The word “vessel” or “vessels,” in §§ 35-152 to 35-155 shall include cans, bottles, siphons, and boxes.

(3)

The word “mark” or “marks” shall include labels, trademarks, and all other methods of distinguishing ownership in vessels, whether printed upon labels or blown into bottles or engraved and impressed upon cans or boxes.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 878a
Feb. 27, 1907, 34 Stat. 1006, ch. 2086
1981 Ed., § 48-301.
1973 Ed., § 48-301.